California, session 20252026, AB1703.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2053.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2053.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who complies with the requirements of Section 2053.6 shall not be in violation of Section 2051 or 2052 unless that person does any of the following:(1) Conducts surgery or any other procedure on another person that punctures the skin or harmfully invades the body.(2) Administers or prescribes x-ray radiation to another person.(3) Prescribes or administers legend drugs or controlled substances to another person.(4) Recommends the discontinuance of legend drugs or controlled substances prescribed by an appropriately licensed practitioner.(5) Willfully diagnoses and treats a physical or mental condition of any person under circumstances or conditions that cause or create a risk of great bodily harm, serious physical or mental illness, or death.(6) Sets fractures.(7) Treats lacerations or abrasions through electrotherapy.(8) Provides osteopathic manipulative treatment. For purposes of this paragraph, “osteopathic manipulative treatment” means the therapeutic application of manually guided forces to alleviate somatic dysfunction.(9) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises, or implies to a client or prospective client that they are a physician, a surgeon, or a physician and surgeon.(b) A person who advertises any services that are not unlawful under Section 2051 or 2052 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall disclose in the advertisement that they are not licensed by the state as a healing arts practitioner.SEC. 2. Section 2453.3 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2453.3. (a) A person who is not licensed by the board shall not use the word “osteopath,” use the phrase “doctor of osteopathy,” use the initials “D.O.,” or indicate or imply that they are a licensed osteopath, licensed doctor of osteopathy, or licensed physician and surgeon licensed by the board when offering or providing a service to treat a medical or physical condition.(b) A person who violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.